Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-3434
Provision of information and records; immunity.

Any person that in good faith provides information or records to a local team shall not be subject to civil or criminal liability or any professional disciplinary action as a result of providing the information or record.

Laws 2023, LB227, § 91.